Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.080

Application of RCW 43.05.060 and 43.05.070—Limited.

The provisions of RCW 43.05.060 and 43.05.070 affecting civil penalties issued by the department of ecology shall not apply to civil penalties for negligent discharge of oil as authorized under RCW 90.56.330 or to civil penalties as authorized under RCW 90.03.600 for unlawful use of water in violation of RCW 90.03.250 or 90.44.050.

[ 1995 c 403 s 609.]